California, session 20252026, AB1799.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to require the public disclosure of material investment holdings, including those held directly or indirectly through affiliated entities, of nonprofit organizations providing integrated health care service plans.